Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 15 General Provisions
2-15-407. Federal regulations regarding industrial hemp.

The State Plant Board shall adopt the federal rules and regulations that are currently enacted regarding industrial hemp as in effect on January 1, 2017.

This subchapter does not authorize a person to violate any federal rules or regulations.

If any part of this subchapter conflicts with a provision of federal law relating to industrial hemp, the federal provision shall control to the extent of the conflict.

Each application shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee of fifty dollars ($50.00).

The board shall establish a fee not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) for an:

Initial license; and

Annual renewal license.

For an industrial hemp research program grower licensee, the board may approve licenses for only those growers whose demonstration plots the board determines will advance the goals of the industrial hemp research program.

The board shall base a determination under subdivision (f)(1) of this section on:

Growing conditions;

Location;

Soil type;

Various varieties of industrial hemp that may be suitable for various hemp products; and

Other relevant factors.

The board shall determine the number of acres to be planted under each license.

A copy of or an electronic record of a license issued by the board under this section shall be forwarded immediately to the sheriff of the county in which the industrial hemp location is licensed.

Records, data, and information filed in support of a license application is proprietary and subject to inspection only upon the order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

At the expense of the license holder, the board shall:

Monitor the industrial hemp grown by each license holder;

Provide for random testing of the industrial hemp for compliance with tetrahydrocannabinol levels; and

Provide for other oversight required by the board.

File with the board documentation indicating that the industrial hemp seeds planted were of a type and variety certified to have no more tetrahydrocannabinol concentration than that adopted in the federal Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. § 801 et seq.;

Notify the board of the sale of industrial hemp grown under the license and the names and addresses of the persons to whom the industrial hemp was sold; and

Provide the board with copies of each contract between the licensee and a person to whom industrial hemp was sold.

Was grown by a licensee; and

Is from certified seed.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (b)(2), deleted the comma following “A bill of lading” and deleted the comma following “documentation”.

Preambles. Acts 1931, No. 73 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the necessity for high grade planting seed for agricultural crops is hereby recognized, the purpose of this act shall be to enable farmers to secure pure bred agricultural seeds true to variety, free from noxious weed seeds and free from plant diseases transmittable through the agency of planting seed and free from insect infestation … .”

Acts 1971, No. 79 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the Alligator Weed poses a serious threat to the waterways and lands of this state, and the eradication of this plant is essential to the welfare of the State of Arkansas and its people; and

“Whereas, the United States Army Corps of Engineers desires to join with the State Plant Board in providing funds for an Alligator Weed Control Program, but Public Law 89-298 will not permit the Corps of Engineers to enter into this project unless the State of Arkansas shall agree to hold and save the United States free from claims that may occur from control operations … .”

Effective Dates. Acts 1917, No. 414, § 20: effective on passage. Emergency declared. Approved Mar. 28, 1917.

Acts 1927, No. 247, § 3: declared effective on passage.

Acts 1929, No. 197, § 4: effective on passage.

Acts 1939, No. 40, § 3: July 1, 1939.

Acts 1971, No. 79, § 3: Feb. 12, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that alligator weed poses a serious threat to the waterways and lands of this state, and that the control and eradication of said alligator weed during its early stages of infestation in this state is of utmost urgency; that the United States Army Corps of Engineers has federal moneys available to assist the State Plant Board in carrying on an Alligator Weed Control and Eradication Program, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to enable the State Plant Board to enter into the necessary agreements with the United States Corps of Engineers to hold and save the United States free from claims that may occur from control operations, as required by Public Law 89-298. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 409, § 4: Mar. 14, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under the present law the Arkansas Forestry Association has no representation on the State Plant Board; that it is essential to the continued growth, development and success of the forestry industry in this state that it be given representation on the State Plant Board; that this act is designed to increase the membership of the State Plant Board and to provide that the additional member shall be a representative of the Arkansas Forestry Association; that this act should be given effect immediately in order to accomplish its purposes at the earliest possible date. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 691, § 19: effective on close of business, June 30, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the various boards, commissions, departments, agencies, and services transferred to the Department of Commerce under the provisions of Acts 1971, No. 38, as amended, could perform their duties more efficiently as independent agencies; that the agencies and services consolidated within the Department of Commerce under Acts 1971, No. 38, are so diverse in their purposes and duties that it is difficult for the Administrator of said Department to exert leadership in the operation of such agencies and programs; and, that the abolishment of the Department of Commerce and its central services would result in financial savings which could be best used for the support and operation of other essential services of government, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to provide for the repeal of the Department of Commerce and for the transition of the various departments, agencies, boards, commissions, and programs and services within said Department to an independent status, as provided herein. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect as follows: Section 15 of this act shall be effective from and after March 1, 1983, and the remaining provisions of this act shall be effective on the close of business June 30, 1983 and thereafter.”

Am. Jur. 3 Am. Jur. 2d, Agri., § 39 et seq.

C.J.S. 3 C.J.S., Agri., §§ 88 et seq., 102 et seq., 115 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1993, No. 783, § 13: Mar. 29, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly meeting in Regular Session that the provisions of this act are of critical importance to the state's ability to continue the duties, responsibilities, and functions of the State Plant Board. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 1262, § 8: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1993 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1993 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1995, No. 1304, § 8: Apr. 14, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this act are of critical importance to the state's ability to continue the duties, responsibilities, and functions of the Arkansas Bureau of Standards. Therefor [sic], an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Industrial hemp that is found in this state at any location off the premises of an industrial hemp grower licensee is contraband and subject to seizure by any law enforcement officer, unless the person in possession of the industrial hemp has in his or her possession either:

(1)The State Plant Board shall revoke the license of an industrial hemp grower licensee who fails to comply with this subchapter or the rules adopted under this subchapter.

(1)Before revocation of an industrial hemp grower license, the board shall provide the industrial hemp grower licensee notice and an informal hearing before the board to show cause why the license should not be revoked and the licensee's right to grow forfeited.

An industrial hemp grower licensee whose license is revoked may appeal the final order of the board by filing an appeal in the circuit court of the district in which the licensee resides.

An industrial hemp grower licensed under this subchapter may receive funds received by the state under the Arkansas Industrial Hemp Program Fund.

The State Plant Board shall adopt rules for applications for grants under this section.

The owner of any valuable pear trees, cedar trees, or other growing trees of real value which have been or may hereafter be cut down and destroyed without his or her consent by the order and direction of the State Plant Board, or by its officers, employees, agents, or inspectors, shall be entitled to compensation for the actual value of the trees cut down or destroyed, to be paid by the county in which the trees were growing.

(1)The owner of the trees shall present to the county court his or her claim in writing, verified by his or her affidavit, stating the kind, number, and value of the trees and when and by what authority the trees were destroyed.

Every person, firm, or corporation bagging any commercial cotton insecticide or poison shall stamp on each bag or on a tag attached to each bag the date on which the insecticide or poison was manufactured.

(1)Any person, firm, or corporation failing or refusing to comply with the requirements of this section shall be guilty of a violation and upon conviction shall be fined in any sum not less than five dollars ($5.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1959, No. 458, §§ 1, 2, are also codified as §20-20-101.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (b)(1); and substituted “the date placed” for “placed the date” in (b)(2).

History.

Acts 2017, No. 981, § 1.

2-15-408. Industrial hemp licenses.

The State Plant Board may establish a program of annual licensure to allow persons to grow industrial hemp in the state.

(1)The industrial hemp licensure program shall include the following forms of license:

(i)An industrial hemp research program grower license, to allow a person to grow industrial hemp in this state in a controlled fashion solely and exclusively as part of the industrial hemp research program overseen by the board.

A license under subdivision (b)(1)(A)(i) of this section is subject to the receipt of necessary permissions, waivers, or other forms of authentication by the United States Drug Enforcement Administration or another appropriate federal agency under applicable federal laws relating to industrial hemp; and

(i)An industrial hemp grower license to allow a person to grow industrial hemp in this state.

A license under subdivision (b)(1)(B)(i) of this section is subject to the authorization of legal industrial hemp growth and production in the United States under applicable federal laws relating to industrial hemp.

A license issued under this section shall authorize industrial hemp propagation only on the land areas specified in the license.

(1)A person seeking an application to grow industrial hemp, whether as part of the industrial hemp research program or otherwise, shall apply to the board for the appropriate license on a form provided by the board.

The board shall require the applicant to include on the form provided by the board under subdivision (c)(1) of this section the following information, including without limitation:

The name and mailing address of the applicant;

The legal description and global positioning coordinates of the production fields to be used to grow industrial hemp; and

(i)Written consent allowing the board, if a license is ultimately issued to the applicant, to enter onto the premises on which the industrial hemp is grown to conduct physical inspections of industrial hemp planted and grown by the applicant to ensure compliance with this subchapter and rules adopted under this subchapter.

Unless a deficiency is found, the board shall make no more than two (2) physical inspections of the production fields of an industrial hemp licensee.

Tetrahydrocannabinol levels shall be tested as provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 981, § 1.

2-15-409. License required — Records.

(1)A person shall obtain an industrial hemp grower license under this subchapter before planting or growing industrial hemp in this state.

An industrial hemp grower license holder who has planted and grown industrial hemp in this state may sell the industrial hemp to a person engaged in agribusiness or other manufacturing for the purpose of research, processing, or manufacturing that industrial hemp into hemp products.

An industrial hemp grower shall:

Maintain records that reflect compliance with this subchapter and all other state laws regulating the planting and cultivation of industrial hemp;

Retain all industrial hemp production records for at least three (3) years;

Allow industrial hemp crops, throughout sowing, growing, and harvesting, to be inspected by and at the discretion of the State Plant Board or its agents;

A person licensed to grow industrial hemp under this subchapter may import and resell industrial hemp seed that has been certified as having no more tetrahydrocannabinol concentration than that adopted in the federal Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. § 801 et seq.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 981, § 1.

2-15-410. Transportation of industrial hemp.

(1)Only an industrial hemp grower licensee or his or her designees or agents may transport industrial hemp off the premises of the licensee.

When transporting industrial hemp off the premises of an industrial hemp grower licensee, the licensee or a designee or agent of the licensee shall carry the licensing documents from the State Plant Board, evidencing that the industrial hemp:

The proper licensing documents under this subchapter; or

A bill of lading or other proper documentation demonstrating that the industrial hemp was legally imported or is otherwise legally present in this state under applicable state and federal laws relating to industrial hemp.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 981, § 1; Acts 2019, No. 378, § 1.

2-15-411. License revocation.

An industrial hemp grower licensee whose license is revoked under subdivision (a)(1) of this section is ineligible for licensure under this subchapter for up to five (5) years after the revocation.

If a license is revoked and a licensee's right to grow is forfeited as the result of an informal hearing under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the industrial hemp grower licensee may request a formal administrative hearing before the board.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 981, § 1.

2-15-412. Grant funds.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 981, § 1.